Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 4 Competitive Wireless Broadband Investment, Deployment, and Safety Act of 2018
13-24-409. Uniform application procedures for local authorities.

A local authority may require an applicant to seek permission by application to colocate a small wireless facility or install a new or modified PSS associated with a small wireless facility and obtain one (1) or more work permits, as long as the work permits are of general applicability and do not apply exclusively to wireless facilities.

If a local authority requires an applicant to seek permission pursuant to subsection (a), the authority must comply with the following:

A local authority shall allow an applicant to include up to twenty (20) small wireless facilities within a single application;

A local authority shall, within thirty (30) days of receiving an application, determine whether an application is complete and notify the applicant. If an application is incomplete, a local authority must specifically identify the missing information in writing when the applicant is notified;

Within thirty (30) days of receiving an application, a local authority may notify an applicant of the need for a conference with the applicant to assist the local authority in understanding or evaluating the applicant's design with regard to one (1) or more small wireless facilities contained in its application;

For an application containing multiple small wireless facilities, the local authority shall specify the specific small wireless facilities for which conference is needed, and the sixty-day period for reviewing the application must be extended to seventy-five (75) days as provided in subdivision (b)(7);

The local authority is responsible for scheduling the conference and shall permit the applicant to attend telephonically. The seventy-five-day period is not tolled while the conference is scheduled unless the applicant agrees to an additional extension of the review period;

Issues that may be addressed by the conference include, but are not limited to:

Safety considerations not adequately addressed by the application or regarding which the local authority proposes additional safety-related alterations to the design;

Potential of conflict with another applicant's application for the same or a nearby location;

Impact of planned construction or other public works projects at or near the location identified by the application; and

Alternative design options that may enable colocation on an existing PSS instead of deployment of a new PSS or opportunities and potential benefits of alternative design that would incorporate other features or elements of benefit to the local authority. However, the existence of alternatives does not constitute a basis for denial of an application that otherwise satisfies all generally applicable standards for construction in the ROW and the requirements established by this part;

A local authority shall process all applications on a nondiscriminatory basis;

Except when extension of the review period is allowed by this section, a local authority shall approve or deny all small wireless facilities within an application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the application. For those applications seeking permission to deploy or colocate multiple small wireless facilities, the local authority shall deny permission only as to those small wireless facilities for which the application does not demonstrate compliance with all generally applicable ROW standards imposed on entities entitled to place infrastructure in the ROW and the requirements established by this part. A local authority shall not deny permission solely on the basis that the small wireless facility was contained in the same application as other small wireless facilities that are not approved;

Any application or any portion of an application that is not approved or denied within sixty (60) days is deemed approved, unless the sixty-day period has been extended consistent with this section. If the period has been extended, then the date on which approval will be deemed to occur is also extended to the same date of the applicable extension;

Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision (b)(7), a local authority shall not extend the sixty-day period to provide for additional or supplemental review by additional departments or designees. The sixty (60) day review period may be tolled or extended only as follows:

The sixty-day period is tolled if a local authority sends notice to the applicant that the application is incomplete within thirty (30) days after the initial application is filed, but this tolling ceases once additional or supplemental information is provided to the local authority. If supplemental information is not received within thirty (30) days of the date on which notice of incompleteness is sent by the authority, then the application may be denied and a new application required;

The local authority and the applicant may mutually agree to toll the sixty-day period;

The sixty-day review period is extended to seventy-five (75) days upon timely notice by the authority of the need for a conference as provided in subdivision (b)(3), but the seventy-five-day period must not be further extended for applications under subdivision (b)(7)(D) or (b)(7)(E);

If an applicant submits applications to the same local authority seeking permission to deploy or colocate more than thirty (30), but fewer than fifty (50), small wireless facilities within any thirty-day period, then the local authority may upon notice to the applicant extend the sixty-day period for reviewing the applications to seventy-five (75) days, but the seventy-five-day period shall not be further extended for a conference as provided in subdivision (b)(7)(C);

If an applicant submits applications to the same local authority seeking permission to deploy or colocate fifty (50) or more small wireless facilities within any thirty-day period, then the local authority may, upon notice to the applicant, extend the period for reviewing the applications to ninety (90) days, but the ninety-day period must not be further extended for a conference as provided in subdivision (b)(7)(C);

If an applicant submits applications to the same local authority seeking permission to deploy or colocate more than one hundred twenty (120) small wireless facilities within any sixty-day period, then the local authority may issue notice to the applicant that the authority requires the applicant to select from the following two (2) options for high-volume applicants:

Pay a surcharge to maintain the same review time period that would be otherwise applicable. The surcharge is in addition to the ordinary application fee provided in § 13-24-407. The surcharge is one hundred dollars ($100) for each small wireless facility that the applicant elects to have reviewed using the otherwise applicable review period, and the applicant shall submit its list identifying the specific small wireless facilities it elects to have reviewed in the ordinarily applicable period with its surcharge payment within five (5) days of receiving the local authority's notice that applications have been received, triggering the election of either a surcharge or extension of the review time period described in (b)(7)(C), (b)(7)(D), or (b)(7)(E); or

If no identifying list is provided or if payment of a surcharge is not made within the applicable time period, or, for those small wireless facilities not timely identified and for which no surcharge is timely paid, the ordinarily applicable review period shall be extended to one hundred-twenty (120) days;

If an applicant submits an application in which the proposed design will affect in any manner a regulatory sign, as defined by the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, or any sign subject to a requirement for breakaway supports, then the local authority may reject the application. If an application is rejected on that basis, however, the local authority shall permit the applicant to seek reconsideration of its design. If the applicant requests reconsideration, then the local authority shall provide the opportunity for the applicant to schedule a conference to discuss the local authority's specific concerns within thirty (30) days of the reconsideration request. The applicant must submit a revised design or otherwise respond to the local authority's concerns within thirty (30) days of the conference, and upon receipt of the revised design or response, the local authority shall approve or deny the application within sixty (60) days, and the local authority has complete discretion to approve or deny the application in a nondiscriminatory manner;

If a local authority denies an application, it shall provide written explanation of this denial at the same time the local authority issues the denial.

A local authority shall not deny an application unless the applicant has failed to satisfy this part or has failed to submit a design that complies with the generally applicable requirements that the local authority imposes on a nondiscriminatory basis upon entities deploying or constructing infrastructure in a ROW.

Contemporaneous with an approval of an application in which the design includes replacement or construction of a new or replacement PSS, a local authority may notify the applicant of the further requirement that the applicant shall provide a professional engineer's certification that the installation of the new or replacement PSS has been completed consistent with the approved design as well as all generally applicable safety and engineering standards.

After denial of an application, if an applicant provides a revised application that cures deficiencies identified by the local authority within thirty (30) days of the denial, then no additional application fee shall be required. A local authority shall approve or deny the revised application within thirty (30) days from the time the revised application is submitted to the authority. Any subsequent review of an application by a local government must be limited to the deficiencies cited in the denial or deficiencies that relate to changes in the revised application and that were not contained in the original application.

A local authority shall not, either expressly or de facto, discontinue its application process or prohibit deployment under the terms of this part prior to adoption of any application process.

A local authority shall not require applicants to provide any information not listed in this subsection (g). A local authority may require the following information to be provided in an application:

A preliminary site plan with a diagram or engineering drawing depicting the design for installation of the small wireless facility with sufficient detail for the local authority to determine that the design of the installation and any new PSS or any modification of a PSS is consistent with all generally applicable safety and design requirements, including the requirements of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices;

The location of the site, including the latitudinal and longitudinal coordinates of the specific location of the site;

Identification of any third party upon whose PSS the applicant intends to colocate and certification by the applicant that it has obtained approval from the third party;

The applicant's identifying information and the identifying information of the owner of the small wireless facility and certification by the applicant or the owner that such person agrees to pay applicable fees and rates, repair damage, and comply with all nondiscriminatory and generally applicable ROW requirements for deployment of any associated infrastructure that is not a small wireless facility and the contact information for the party that will respond in the event of an emergency related to the small wireless facility;

The applicant's certification of compliance with surety bond, insurance, or indemnification requirements; rules requiring maintenance of infrastructure deployed in ROW; rule requiring relocation or timely removal of infrastructure in ROW no longer utilized; and any rules requiring relocation or repair procedures for infrastructure in ROW under emergency conditions, if any, that the local authority imposes on a general and nondiscriminatory basis upon entities that are entitled to deploy infrastructure in the ROW; and

The applicant's certification that the proposed site plan and design plans meet or exceed all applicable engineering, materials, electrical, and safety standards, including all standards related to the structural integrity and weight-bearing capacity of the PSS and small wireless facility. Those standards relevant to engineering must be certified by a licensed professional engineer.

An applicant must complete deployment of the applicant's small wireless facilities within nine (9) months of approval of applications for the small wireless facilities unless the local authority and the applicant agree to extend the period, or a delay is caused by a lack of commercial power or communications transport facilities to the site. If an applicant fails to complete deployment within the time required pursuant to this subsection (h), then the local authority may require that the applicant complete a new application and pay an application fee.

If a local authority receives multiple applications seeking to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities at the same location in an incompatible manner, then the local authority may deny the later filed application.

A local authority may require the applicant to designate a safety contact for any colocation design that includes attachment of any facility or structure to a bridge or overpass. After the applicant's construction is complete, the applicant shall provide to the safety contact a licensed professional engineer's certification that the construction is consistent with the applicant's approved design, that the bridge or overpass maintains the same structural integrity as before the construction and installation process, and that during the construction and installation process neither the applicant nor its contractors have discovered evidence of damage to or deterioration of the bridge or overpass that compromises its structural integrity. If such evidence is discovered during construction, then the applicant shall provide notice of the evidence to the safety contact.

The approval of the installation, placement, maintenance, or operation of a small wireless facility pursuant to this part does not authorize the provision of any communications service or the installation, placement, maintenance or operation of any communications facility, including a wireline backhaul facility, other than a small wireless facility, in a right of way.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 5 provided that except for review periods established in this section, all other provisions of the act shall take effect April 24, 2018.

13-24-410. Provisions applicable solely to the state as an authority.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this part to the contrary, the deployment of small wireless facilities in state ROW is subject to this section, as follows:

In those instances in which an applicant seeks to deploy a small wireless facility or new PSS within a state ROW under the control of the department of transportation or to colocate on state-owned PSSs that are subject to oversight by the department of transportation, an application must be made to the department of transportation;

The department of transportation may charge an applicant an application fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each application to deploy small wireless facilities in a state ROW up to a maximum of five (5) small wireless facilities. The department may charge an additional fee in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each additional small wireless facility included in a single application. Beginning on January 1, 2020, and at each five-year interval thereafter, the application fees established in this subdivision (2)(A) shall increase by the amount of ten percent (10%);

The department of transportation shall not require a permit or charge an application fee for routine maintenance or replacement of a small wireless facility in a state ROW unless the maintenance or replacement requires the installation of a new PSS or the replacement of a PSS or the maintenance or replacement activity will require disturbance of the highway pavement or shoulders;

The department of transportation may impose inspection costs in the same manner such costs are imposed with respect to other entities that deploy infrastructure in a state ROW; and

The department of transportation may require the applicant to provide a surety bond in the same manner as a surety bond is required with respect to other entities that deploy infrastructure in a state ROW;

The application shall conform to the department of transportation's generally applicable rules or policies applicable to those entities that the department of transportation permits to deploy infrastructure in a state ROW;

The department of transportation shall endeavor, when feasible in its discretion, to comply with the timetable for review of applications by local authorities set out in § 13-24-409, but the department of transportation shall have discretion to extend the time for review and shall provide notice to the applicant of additional time needed. No application to the department of transportation shall be deemed approved until the application is affirmatively acted upon;

Until the department of transportation promulgates rules for the deployment of small wireless facilities as set forth in subdivision (8), the department of transportation shall accept applications to deploy small wireless facilities in a state ROW and shall consider each application on a case-by-case basis and shall, in its complete discretion, grant or deny such applications;

Nothing in this part precludes the department of transportation from exercising any regulatory power or conducting any action necessary to comply with 23 USC § 131 and § 54-21-116 relating to the regulation of billboards or to satisfy any requirements of federal funding established by state and federal law;

To ensure that this part does not impose new costs significant enough to outweigh the benefits of small wireless facilities, the department of transportation shall not be required to reimburse the costs of relocation of small wireless facilities from a state ROW, notwithstanding any decision the department of transportation may make to exercise its discretionary authority under § 54-5-804 to reimburse other owners of utility facilities for relocation costs arising from a highway construction project;

The department of transportation shall promulgate rules or establish agency policies applicable to deployment of small wireless facilities within state ROW and the colocation of small wireless facilities on state-owned PSS in state ROW, including, but not limited to, the establishment of an annual rate for the colocation of a small wireless facility on state-owned PSS in a state ROW. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5; and

Nothing in this part restricts the department of transportation from the management of a state ROW or a state-owned PSS in a state ROW as otherwise established by law.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-411. Authority powers preserved.

Consistent with the limitations in this part, an authority may require applicants to:

Follow generally applicable and nondiscriminatory requirements for entities that deploy infrastructure or perform construction in a ROW:

Requiring structures and facilities placed within a ROW to be constructed and maintained as not to obstruct or hinder the usual travel upon pedestrian or automotive travel ways;

Requiring compliance with Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Guidelines (ADAAG) standards adopted by the authority to achieve compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.), including Public Rights-of-Way Accessibility Guidelines (PROWAG) if adopted by the authority;

Requiring compliance with measures necessary for public safety; and

Prohibiting obstruction of the legal use of a ROW by utilities;

Follow an aesthetic plan established by the authority for a defined area, neighborhood, or zone by complying with generally applicable and nondiscriminatory standards on all entities entitled to deploy infrastructure in a ROW, except that an authority shall not apply standards in a manner that precludes all deployment of small wireless facilities or precludes deployment of small wireless facilities as a permitted use pursuant to zoning requirements and an authority shall provide detailed explanation of any denial based on the failure of the design to conform to the aesthetic plan. Notwithstanding this subdivision (2), in residential neighborhoods, an authority may impose generally applicable standards that limit deployment or colocation of small wireless facilities in public utility easements when the easements are:

Not contiguous with paved roads or alleys on which vehicles are permitted;

Located along the rear of residential lots; and

Subject to a generally applicable restriction that no electric distribution or telephone utility poles are permitted to be deployed;

In residential neighborhoods, deploy new PSS in a ROW to be located within twenty-five feet (25') from the property boundaries separating residential lots larger than three-quarters of an acre in size and may require new PSS deployed in a ROW to be located within fifteen feet (15') from the property boundaries separating residential lots three-quarters of an acre in size or smaller;

Repair damage caused by entities entitled to deploy infrastructure in a ROW, including damage to public roadways or to other utility facilities placed in a ROW based on generally applicable and nondiscriminatory requirements imposed by the authority; and

Require maintenance or relocation of infrastructure deployed in the ROW; timely removal of infrastructure no longer utilized; and insurance, surety bonds, or indemnification for claims arising from the applicant's negligence to the same extent the authority applies such requirements generally to entities entitled to deploy infrastructure in ROW based on generally applicable and nondiscriminatory requirements imposed by the authority.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-412. Private right of action.

Any party aggrieved by the failure of an authority to act in accordance with this part may seek remedy in the chancery court for the county in which the applicant attempted to deploy or has deployed a small wireless facility, unless the claim seeks a remedy against the state, in which case the claim must be brought in the chancery court of Davidson County. The court may order an appropriate remedy to address any action inconsistent with this part.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-413. Study on impact of deployment of broadband — Best Practices — Recommendations — Report.

The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations shall study and prepare a report on the impact of this part, including:

The impact on deployment of broadband;

The fiscal impact on authorities resulting from the administrative process required by this part;

Best practices from the perspective of applicants and authorities;

Best practices in other states and identify opportunities to advance the quality of transportation in this state by utilizing technological applications, sometimes referred to as “smart transportation applications,” that are supported by small wireless facilities; and

Recommendations for changes to this part based on the study's findings.

The report must be delivered to the chairs of the commerce committee of the house of representatives and commerce and labor committee of the senate by January 1, 2021.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 3; 2019, ch. 345, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “commerce” for “house business and utilities” following “chairs of the”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.